District of Columbia statutes.
34-213

“Pipeline company” defined.

The term “pipeline company” when used in this subtitle includes every corporation, company, association, joint-stock company or association, partnership, or person, their lessees, trustees, or receivers, appointed by any court whatsoever, owning, operating, managing, or controlling the supply of any liquid, steam, or air through pipes or tubing to consumers for use or for lighting, heating, or cooling purposes, or for power.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 976, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
1981 Ed., § 43-221.
1973 Ed., § 43-121.